Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3604
Physician; expedited license; eligibility requirements; failure to meet requirements; effect.

(a) A physician must meet the eligibility requirements as defined in subdivision (k) of section 38-3603 to receive an expedited license under the terms and provisions of the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact.

(b) A physician who does not meet the requirements of subdivision (k) of section 38-3603 may obtain a license to practice medicine in a member state if the individual complies with all laws and requirements, other than the compact, relating to the issuance of a license to practice medicine in that state.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 4.